Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska31-932
Drainage district; dissolution; right-of-way interest becomes property of county.

Upon dissolution of any drainage district, the right-of-way interest of such drainage district shall pass to and become the property of the county where located. Nothing in this section shall apply to any irrigation ditch or ditches.

Laws 1959, c. 132, § 32, p. 493.